District of Columbia statutes.
34-2202.06

General Manager; employment and duties.

(a)

The Board, by the affirmative vote of 8 of its members, shall employ a General Manager who shall be the chief administrative officer of the Authority. The General Manager shall not be a member of the Board and shall serve at the pleasure of the Board. The General Manager shall perform duties as determined by the Board.

(b)

The General Manager, in his or her sole discretion, may restrict combined sewer flow into the District from Maryland and Virginia, so long as the action does not violate § 34-2202.18.

Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-111, § 206, 43 DCR 548
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-184, § 202(f), 43 DCR 4265
Feb. 6, 2008, D.C. Law 17-108, § 213(a), 54 DCR 10993
July 15, 2008, 122 Stat. 2491, Pub. L. 110-273, § 4(a)
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-370, § 3(a), 56 DCR 1350
1981 Ed., § 43-1676.
D.C. Law 17-108 inserted “The General Manager shall be a resident of the District and shall remain a District resident for the duration of his or her employment by the Authority. Failure to maintain District residency shall result in a forfeiture of the position.”
Pub. L. 110-273 deleted the two sentences added by D.C. Law 17-108.
D.C. Law 17-370 designated subsec. (a); and added subsec. (b).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(f) of the District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-293, July 9, 1996, 43 DCR 4160).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(f) of the Water and Sewer Authority Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-397, October 9, 1996, 43 DCR 5686), § 2(f) of the Water and Sewer Authority Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-466, December 30, 1996, 44 DCR 165), and § 2(f) of the Water and Sewer Authority Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-48, March 31, 1997, 44 DCR 2105).
Section 4(b) of Pub. L. 110-273 provided that subsection (a) shall take effect as if included in the enactment of D.C. Law 17-172.